Washington statutes.
RCW 16.50.110

Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter:

(1) "Department" means the department of agriculture of the state of Washington.

(2) "Director" means the director of the department or his or her duly appointed representative.

(3) "Humane method" means either: (a) A method whereby the animal is rendered insensible to pain by mechanical, electrical, chemical, or other means that is rapid and effective, before being shackled, hoisted, thrown, cast, or cut; or (b) a method in accordance with the ritual requirements of any religious faith whereby the animal suffers loss of consciousness by anemia of the brain caused by the simultaneous and instantaneous severance of the carotid arteries with a sharp instrument.

(4) "Livestock" means cattle, calves, sheep, swine, horses, mules, and goats.

(5) "Packer" means any person engaged in the business of slaughtering livestock.

(6) "Person" means a natural person, individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, society, and association and every officer, agent, or employee, thereof. This term shall import either the singular or plural, as the case may be.

(7) "Slaughterer" means any person engaged in the commercial or custom slaughtering of livestock, including custom farm slaughterers.

[ 2011 c 336 s 421; 1967 c 31 s 2.]